lv-rules.xfst
! Nikolay Vorontsov, Latvian's Nouns, 7 Jan. 2023

clear stack

read lexc lv.lexc

define Lexicon ;

regex Lexicon ;

echo <<Latvian Vocabulary Nouns Defined>>

echo <<Defining Palatalisation Rules>>

define Palatalisation	p -> p j ,
   			b -> b j ,
			m -> m j ,
			v -> v j ,
			f -> f j ,

			s n -> š ņ ,
			z n -> ž ņ ,
			s l -> š ļ ,
			z l -> ž ļ ,
			l n -> ļ ņ ,
			l l -> ļ ļ ,
			n n -> ņ ņ ,
			s t -> š ,

			c -> č ,
			d -> ž ,
			c -> č ,
			d -> ž ,
			l -> ļ ,
			n -> ņ ,
			s -> š ,
			t -> š ,
			z -> ž ||  _  %^J ;   

define CleanUp		%^J -> 0 ;

read regex Lexicon .o. Palatalisation .o. CleanUp ;
